Utah statutes.
53A-17a-105.   Powers and duties of State Board of Education to adjust Minimum School Program allocations.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2) or (4), if the number of weighted pupil units in a program is underestimated, the State Board of Education shall reduce the value of the weighted pupil unit in that program so that the total amount paid for the program does not exceed the amount appropriated for the program.

(2)  If the number of weighted pupil units in a program is overestimated, the State Board of Education shall spend excess money appropriated for the following purposes giving priority to the purpose described in Subsection (2)(a):

(a)  to support the value of the weighted pupil unit in a program within the basic state-supported school program in which the number of weighted pupil units is underestimated;

(b)  to support the state guarantee per weighted pupil unit provided under the voted local levy program established in Section 53A-17a-133 or the board local levy program established in Section 53A-17a-164, if:

(i)  local contributions to the voted local levy program or board local levy program are overestimated; or

(ii)  the number of weighted pupil units within school districts qualifying for a guarantee is underestimated;

(c)  to support the state supplement to local property taxes allocated to charter schools, if the state supplement is less than the amount prescribed by Subsection 53A-1a-513(4); or

(d)  to support a school district with a loss in student enrollment as provided in Section 53A-17a-139.

(3)  If local contributions from the minimum basic tax rate imposed under Section 53A-17a-135 are overestimated, the State Board of Education shall reduce the value of the weighted pupil unit for all programs within the basic state-supported school program so the total state contribution to the basic state-supported school program does not exceed the amount of state funds appropriated.

(4)  If local contributions from the minimum basic tax rate imposed under Section 53A-17a-135 are underestimated, the State Board of Education shall:

(a)  spend the excess local contributions for the purposes specified in Subsection (2), giving priority to supporting the value of the weighted pupil unit in programs within the basic state-supported school program in which the number of weighted pupil units is underestimated; and

(b)  reduce the state contribution to the basic state-supported school program so the total cost of the basic state-supported school program does not exceed the total state and local funds appropriated to the basic state-supported school program plus the local contributions necessary to support the value of the weighted pupil unit in programs within the basic state-supported school program in which the number of weighted pupil units is underestimated.

(5)  Except as provided in Subsection (2) or (4), the State Board of Education shall reduce the guarantee per weighted pupil unit provided under the voted local levy program established in Section 53A-17a-133 or board local levy program established in Section 53A-17a-164, if:

(a)  local contributions to the voted local levy program or board local levy program are overestimated; or

(b)  the number of weighted pupil units within school districts qualifying for a guarantee is underestimated.

(6)  Money appropriated to the State Board of Education is nonlapsing.

(7)  The State Board of Education shall report actions taken by the board under this section to the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst and the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget.

